Utah statutes.
53A-1-1104.   Schools included in grading system.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), a school that has students who take statewide assessments shall receive a school grade.

(2)  A school may not receive a school grade, if the number of a school's students tested is less than the minimum sample size necessary, based on accepted professional practice for statistical reliability or the prevention of the unlawful release of personally identifiable student data under 20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232h.

